Wisconsin, session 2025, SB510.
do enact as follows:SB510,11Section 1. 7.335 of the statutes is created to read:SB510,2,227.335 Requirement to serve as election official. (1) In this section:SB510,2,53(a) “Nonjudicial elective state office” means the offices of governor, lieutenant 4governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state superintendent of public 5instruction, state senator, and state representative to the assembly.SB510,2,96(b) “Nonjudicial elective state official” means any person who holds a 7nonjudicial elective state office or has been elected to a nonjudicial elective state 8office but has not yet taken office. A person who is appointed to fill a vacant 9nonjudicial elective state office is a nonjudicial elective state official.SB510,3,510(2) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), each nonjudicial elective state official, 11during the person’s first full term holding a nonjudicial elective state office and 12once every 3 years for as long as the person holds any nonjudicial elective state 13office, shall serve as an election official for an election held in any municipality in 14this state, except that the person may not serve as an election official for an election 15in which the person is a candidate on the ballot. The nonjudicial elective state 16official shall be appointed and trained in the same manner as other election 17officials are appointed and trained under ss. 7.30, 7.31, and 7.315. For purposes of 1this subsection, the nonjudicial elective state official shall serve as an election 2official on election day for no fewer than 8 hours. In addition, the appointment of a 3nonjudicial elective state official to serve as an election official, as provided under 4this subsection, does not count towards any limit that a municipality imposes on the 5number of election officials hired or appointed to serve at an election.SB510,3,126(b) This subsection does not apply to any nonjudicial elective state official who 7is physically incapable of serving as an election official for 8 hours on election day, if 8the nonjudicial elective state official provides to the commission, in the form and 9manner determined by the commission, a sworn statement from a physician, as 10defined in s. 448.01 (5), or physician assistant, as defined in s. 448.971 (2), that 11verifies that the nonjudicial elective state official is physically incapable of serving 12as an election official for 8 hours on election day.SB510,3,1613(c) A nonjudicial elective state official shall attend the training required under 14par. (a) during the period prescribed under s. 7.31 (4) regardless of whether the 15nonjudicial elective state official is not serving or unable to serve as an election 16official on any election day during that period.SB510,3,2017(3) It is compatible with his or her office for a nonjudicial elective state official 18to serve as an election official appointed under s. 7.30 (2) (a), but the nonjudicial 19elective state official may not be compensated for that service, notwithstanding s. 207.03.SB510,4,421(4) After the nonjudicial elective state official satisfies the requirements 22under sub. (2) for serving as an election official on election day, the chief inspector 23or municipal clerk at the polling place or alternate site under s. 6.855 where the 1nonjudicial elective state official served shall certify to the commission that the 2nonjudicial elective state official has satisfied the requirements by submitting an 3affidavit to the commission, signed by the nonjudicial elective state official and the 4chief inspector or municipal clerk.SB510,25Section 2. 13.02 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB510,4,8613.02 (5) Neither the assembly nor the senate shall meet on any day in which 7an election, other than a special election, is being held in this state for a local, state, 8or national office, nor shall a legislative committee meet on any such day.SB510,4,99